Utah statutes.
41-6a-1635.   Windshields and windows -- Tinting -- Obstructions reducing
visibility -- Wipers -- Prohibitions.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), a person may not operate a
motor vehicle with:
(a)  a windshield that allows less than 70% light transmittance;
(b)  a front side window that allows less than 43% light transmittance;
(c)  any windshield or window that is composed of, covered by, or treated with
any material or component that presents a metallic or mirrored appearance; or
(d)  any sign, poster, or other nontransparent material on the windshield or
side windows of the motor vehicle except:
(i)  a certificate or other paper required to be so displayed by law; or
(ii)  the vehicle's identification number displayed or etched in accordance
with rules made by the department under Section 41-6a-1601.
(2)  Nontransparent materials may be used:
(a)  along the top edge of the windshield if the materials do not extend
downward more than four inches from the top edge of the windshield or beyond
the AS-1 line whichever is lowest;
(b)  in the lower left-hand corner of the windshield provided they do not
extend more than three inches to the right of the left edge or more than four
inches above the bottom edge of the windshield; or
(c) on the rear windows including rear side windows located behind the vehicle
operator.
(3)  A windshield or other window is considered to comply with the
requirements of Subsection (1) if the windshield or other window meets the
federal statutes and regulations for motor vehicle window composition,
covering, light transmittance, and treatment.
(4)  Except for material used on the windshield in compliance with Subsections
(2)(a) and (b), a motor vehicle with tinting or nontransparent material on any
window shall be equipped with rear-view mirrors mounted on the left side and
on the right side of the motor vehicle to reflect to the driver a view of the
highway to the rear of the motor vehicle.
(5) (a) (i)  The windshield on a motor vehicle shall be equipped with a device
for cleaning rain, snow, or other moisture from the windshield.
(ii)  The device shall be constructed to be operated by the operator of the
motor vehicle.
(b) A windshield wiper on a motor vehicle shall be maintained in good working
order.
(6)  A person may not have for sale, sell, offer for sale, install, cover, or
treat a windshield or window in violation of this section.
(7)  Notwithstanding this section, any person subject to the federal Motor
Vehicle Safety Standards, including motor vehicle manufacturers, distributors,
dealers, importers, and repair businesses, shall comply with the federal
standards on motor vehicle window tinting.
